Tennessee, session 114, HB0890.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-701(e)(1), is amended by
adding the following language at the end of the subdivision:
The comptroller of the treasury may provide the estimates to members of the general
assembly via electronic means.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0890
002242
- 1 -